Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3129.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-30-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-30 entitled "Personal
Income Tax" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-30-12. Rhode Island income of a resident individual.
(a) General. The Rhode Island income of a resident individual means the individual’s
adjusted gross income for federal income tax purposes, with the modifications specified in this
section.
(b) Modifications increasing federal adjusted gross income. There shall be added to
federal adjusted gross income:
(1) Interest income on obligations of any state, or its political subdivisions, other than
Rhode Island or its political subdivisions;
(2) Interest or dividend income on obligations or securities of any authority, commission,
or instrumentality of the United States, but not of Rhode Island or its political subdivisions, to the
extent exempted by the laws of the United States from federal income tax but not from state income
taxes;
(3) The modification described in § 44-30-25(g);
(4)(i) The amount defined below of a nonqualified withdrawal made from an account in
the tuition savings program pursuant to § 16-57-6.1. For purposes of this section, a nonqualified
withdrawal is:
(A) A transfer or rollover to a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal

Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 529, other than to the tuition savings program referred to in § 16-57-
6.1; and
(B) A withdrawal or distribution that is:
(I) Not applied on a timely basis to pay “qualified higher education expenses” as defined
in § 16-57-3(12) of the beneficiary of the account from which the withdrawal is made;
(II) Not made for a reason referred to in § 16-57-6.1(e); or
(III) Not made in other circumstances for which an exclusion from tax made applicable by
Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 529, pertains if the transfer, rollover,
withdrawal, or distribution is made within two (2) taxable years following the taxable year for
which a contributions modification pursuant to subsection (c)(4) of this section is taken based on
contributions to any tuition savings program account by the person who is the participant of the
account at the time of the contribution, whether or not the person is the participant of the account
at the time of the transfer, rollover, withdrawal, or distribution;
(ii) In the event of a nonqualified withdrawal under subsection (b)(4)(i)(A) or (b)(4)(i)(B)
of this section, there shall be added to the federal adjusted gross income of that person for the
taxable year of the withdrawal an amount equal to the lesser of:
(A) The amount equal to the nonqualified withdrawal reduced by the sum of any
administrative fee or penalty imposed under the tuition savings program in connection with the
nonqualified withdrawal plus the earnings portion thereof, if any, includible in computing the
person’s federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year; and
(B) The amount of the person’s contribution modification pursuant to subsection (c)(4) of
this section for the person’s taxable year of the withdrawal and the two (2) prior taxable years less
the amount of any nonqualified withdrawal for the two (2) prior taxable years included in
computing the person’s Rhode Island income by application of this subsection for those years. Any
amount added to federal adjusted gross income pursuant to this subdivision shall constitute Rhode
Island income for residents, nonresidents, and part-year residents;
(5) The modification described in § 44-30-25.1(d)(3)(i);
(6) The amount equal to any unemployment compensation received but not included in
federal adjusted gross income;
(7) The amount equal to the deduction allowed for sales tax paid for a purchase of a
qualified motor vehicle as defined by the Internal Revenue Code § 164(a)(6);
(8) For any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, the amount of any Paycheck
Protection Program loan forgiven for federal income tax purposes as authorized by the Coronavirus
Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act and/or the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 and/or
LC006160 - Page 2 of 9

any other subsequent federal stimulus relief packages enacted by law, to the extent that the amount
of the loan forgiven exceeds $250,000, including an individual’s distributive share of the amount
of a pass-through entity’s loan forgiveness in excess of $250,000; and
(9) For the taxable year beginning on or before January 1, 2025, the amount of any income,
deduction or allowance that would be subject to federal income tax but for the Congressional
enactment of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act or any other similar Congressional enactment. The
enactment of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act or any other similar Congressional enactment and any
Internal Revenue Service changes to forms, regulations, and/or processing which go into effect
during the current tax year or within six (6) months of the beginning of the next tax year shall be
deemed grounds for the promulgation of emergency rules and regulations under § 42-35-2.10 to
effectuate the purpose of preserving the Rhode Island tax base under Rhode Island law with respect
to the One Big Beautiful Bill Act or any other similar Congressional enactment.
(c) Modifications reducing federal adjusted gross income. There shall be subtracted
from federal adjusted gross income:
(1) Any interest income on obligations of the United States and its possessions to the extent
includible in gross income for federal income tax purposes, and any interest or dividend income on
obligations, or securities of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the United States to
the extent includible in gross income for federal income tax purposes but exempt from state income
taxes under the laws of the United States; provided, that the amount to be subtracted shall in any
case be reduced by any interest on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or carry
obligations or securities the income of which is exempt from Rhode Island personal income tax, to
the extent the interest has been deducted in determining federal adjusted gross income or taxable
income;
(2) A modification described in § 44-30-25(f) or § 44-30-1.1(c)(1);
(3) The amount of any withdrawal or distribution from the “tuition savings program”
referred to in § 16-57-6.1 that is included in federal adjusted gross income, other than a withdrawal
or distribution or portion of a withdrawal or distribution that is a nonqualified withdrawal;
(4) Contributions made to an account under the tuition savings program, including the
“contributions carryover” pursuant to subsection (c)(4)(iv) of this section, if any, subject to the
following limitations, restrictions, and qualifications:
(i) The aggregate subtraction pursuant to this subdivision for any taxable year of the
taxpayer shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) or one thousand dollars ($1,000) if a joint
return;
(ii) The following shall not be considered contributions:
LC006160 - Page 3 of 9

(A) Contributions made by any person to an account who is not a participant of the account
at the time the contribution is made;
(B) Transfers or rollovers to an account from any other tuition savings program account or
from any other “qualified tuition program” under section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C. § 529; or
(C) A change of the beneficiary of the account;
(iii) The subtraction pursuant to this subdivision shall not reduce the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income to less than zero (0);
(iv) The contributions carryover to a taxable year for purpose of this subdivision is the
excess, if any, of the total amount of contributions actually made by the taxpayer to the tuition
savings program for all preceding taxable years for which this subsection is effective over the sum
of:
(A) The total of the subtractions under this subdivision allowable to the taxpayer for all
such preceding taxable years; and
(B) That part of any remaining contribution carryover at the end of the taxable year which
exceeds the amount of any nonqualified withdrawals during the year and the prior two (2) taxable
years not included in the addition provided for in this subdivision for those years. Any such part
shall be disregarded in computing the contributions carryover for any subsequent taxable year;
(v) For any taxable year for which a contributions carryover is applicable, the taxpayer
shall include a computation of the carryover with the taxpayer’s Rhode Island personal income tax
return for that year, and if for any taxable year on which the carryover is based the taxpayer filed a
joint Rhode Island personal income tax return but filed a return on a basis other than jointly for a
subsequent taxable year, the computation shall reflect how the carryover is being allocated between
the prior joint filers;
(5) The modification described in § 44-30-25.1(d)(1);
(6) Amounts deemed taxable income to the taxpayer due to payment or provision of
insurance benefits to a dependent, including a domestic partner pursuant to chapter 12 of title 36 or
other coverage plan;
(7) Modification for organ transplantation.
(i) An individual may subtract up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) from federal adjusted
gross income if the individual, while living, donates one or more of their human organs to another
human being for human organ transplantation, except that for purposes of this subsection, “human
organ” means all or part of a liver, pancreas, kidney, intestine, lung, or bone marrow. A subtract
modification that is claimed hereunder may be claimed in the taxable year in which the human
LC006160 - Page 4 of 9

organ transplantation occurs.
(ii) An individual may claim that subtract modification hereunder only once, and the
subtract modification may be claimed for only the following unreimbursed expenses that are
incurred by the claimant and related to the claimant’s organ donation:
(A) Travel expenses.
(B) Lodging expenses.
(C) Lost wages.
(iii) The subtract modification hereunder may not be claimed by a part-time resident or a
nonresident of this state;
(8) Modification for taxable Social Security income.
(i) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2016:
(A) For a person who has attained the age used for calculating full or unreduced Social
Security retirement benefits who files a return as an unmarried individual, head of household, or
married filing separate whose federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year is less than eighty
thousand dollars ($80,000); or
(B) A married individual filing jointly or individual filing qualifying widow(er) who has
attained the age used for calculating full or unreduced Social Security retirement benefits whose
joint federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year is less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000), an amount equal to the Social Security benefits includible in federal adjusted gross
income.
(ii) Adjustment for inflation. The dollar amount contained in subsections (c)(8)(i)(A) and
(c)(8)(i)(B) of this section shall be increased annually by an amount equal to:
(A) Such dollar amount contained in subsections (c)(8)(i)(A) and (c)(8)(i)(B) of this section
adjusted for inflation using a base tax year of 2000, multiplied by;
(B) The cost-of-living adjustment with a base year of 2000.
(iii) For the purposes of this section the cost-of-living adjustment for any calendar year is
the percentage (if any) by which the consumer price index for the preceding calendar year exceeds
the consumer price index for the base year. The consumer price index for any calendar year is the
average of the consumer price index as of the close of the twelve-month (12) period ending on
August 31, of such calendar year.
(iv) For the purpose of this section the term “consumer price index” means the last
consumer price index for all urban consumers published by the department of labor. For the purpose
of this section the revision of the consumer price index which is most consistent with the consumer
price index for calendar year 1986 shall be used.
LC006160 - Page 5 of 9

(v) If any increase determined under this section is not a multiple of fifty dollars ($50.00),
such increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of fifty dollars ($50.00). In the case of a
married individual filing separate return, if any increase determined under this section is not a
multiple of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), such increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple
of twenty-five dollars ($25.00);
(9) Modification of taxable retirement income from certain pension plans or
annuities.
(i) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, until the tax year beginning January
1, 2022, a modification shall be allowed for up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), and for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, until the tax year beginning January 1, 2024, a
modification shall be allowed for up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), and for tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2025, a modification shall be allowed for up to fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000), of taxable pension and/or annuity income that is included in federal adjusted
gross income for the taxable year:
(A) For a person who has attained the age used for calculating full or unreduced Social
Security retirement benefits who files a return as an unmarried individual, head of household, or
married filing separate whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is less than the
amount used for the modification contained in subsection (c)(8)(i)(A) of this section an amount not
to exceed $15,000 for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, until the tax year beginning
January 1, 2022, and an amount not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2023, until the tax year beginning January 1, 2024, and an amount
not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025,
of taxable pension and/or annuity income includible in federal adjusted gross income; or
(B) For a married individual filing jointly or individual filing qualifying widow(er) who
has attained the age used for calculating full or unreduced Social Security retirement benefits whose
joint federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is less than the amount used for the
modification contained in subsection (c)(8)(i)(B) of this section an amount not to exceed $15,000
for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, until the tax year beginning January 1, 2022,
and an amount not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2023, until the tax year beginning January 1, 2024, and an amount not to exceed fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, of taxable pension
and/or annuity income includible in federal adjusted gross income.
(ii) Adjustment for inflation. The dollar amount contained by reference in subsections
(c)(9)(i)(A) and (c)(9)(i)(B) of this section shall be increased annually for tax years beginning on
LC006160 - Page 6 of 9

or after January 1, 2018, by an amount equal to:
(A) Such dollar amount contained by reference in subsections (c)(9)(i)(A) and (c)(9)(i)(B)
of this section adjusted for inflation using a base tax year of 2000, multiplied by;
(B) The cost-of-living adjustment with a base year of 2000.
(iii) For the purposes of this section, the cost-of-living adjustment for any calendar year is
the percentage (if any) by which the consumer price index for the preceding calendar year exceeds
the consumer price index for the base year. The consumer price index for any calendar year is the
average of the consumer price index as of the close of the twelve-month (12) period ending on
August 31, of such calendar year.
(iv) For the purpose of this section, the term “consumer price index” means the last
consumer price index for all urban consumers published by the department of labor. For the purpose
of this section, the revision of the consumer price index which is most consistent with the consumer
price index for calendar year 1986 shall be used.
(v) If any increase determined under this section is not a multiple of fifty dollars ($50.00),
such increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of fifty dollars ($50.00). In the case of a
married individual filing a separate return, if any increase determined under this section is not a
multiple of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), such increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple
of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).
(vi) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the dollar amount contained by
reference in subsection (c)(9)(i)(A) shall be adjusted to equal the dollar amount contained in
subsection (c)(8)(i)(A), as adjusted for inflation, and the dollar amount contained by reference in
subsection(c)(9)(i)(B) shall be adjusted to equal the dollar amount contained in subsection
(c)(8)(i)(B), as adjusted for inflation;
(10) Modification for Rhode Island investment in opportunity zones. For purposes of
a taxpayer’s state tax liability, in the case of any investment in a Rhode Island opportunity zone by
the taxpayer for at least seven (7) years, a modification to income shall be allowed for the
incremental difference between the benefit allowed under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-2(b)(2)(B)(iv) and
the federal benefit allowed under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-2(c);
(11) Modification for military service pensions.
(i) For purposes of a taxpayer’s state tax liability, a modification to income shall be allowed
as follows:
(A) For the tax years beginning on January 1, 2023, a taxpayer may subtract from federal
adjusted gross income the taxpayer’s military service pension benefits included in federal adjusted
gross income;
LC006160 - Page 7 of 9

(ii) As used in this subsection, the term “military service” shall have the same meaning as
set forth in 20 C.F.R. § 212.2;
(iii) At no time shall the modification allowed under this subsection alone or in conjunction
with subsection (c)(9) exceed the amount of the military service pension received in the tax year
for which the modification is claimed;
(12) Any rebate issued to the taxpayer pursuant to § 44-30-103 to the extent included in
gross income for federal tax purposes; and
(13) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, in the case of a taxpayer that is
licensed in accordance with chapters 28.6 and/or 28.11 of title 21, the amount equal to any
expenditure that is eligible to be claimed as a federal income tax deduction but is disallowed under
26 U.S.C. § 280E; and
(14) The amount received from public pension benefits administered by the employees'
retirement system of Rhode Island.
(d) Modification for Rhode Island fiduciary adjustment. There shall be added to, or
subtracted from, federal adjusted gross income (as the case may be) the taxpayer’s share, as
beneficiary of an estate or trust, of the Rhode Island fiduciary adjustment determined under § 44-
30-17.
(e) Partners. The amounts of modifications required to be made under this section by a
partner, which relate to items of income or deduction of a partnership, shall be determined under §
44-30-15.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006160
========
LC006160 - Page 8 of 9